Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF1908.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin [609.016] CRIMINAL CASE INFORMATION COLLECTION. new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Collection. new text end new text begin (a) A criminal justice official or entity associated with a criminal case shall collect the following information: new text end new text begin (1) for each jail detainee and criminal defendant: new text end new text begin (i) full name and known aliases; new text end new text begin (ii) year of birth; new text end new text begin (iii) age at arrest; new text end new text begin (iv) primary language; new text end new text begin (v) race and ethnicity; new text end new text begin (vi) sex; new text end new text begin (vii) gender; new text end new text begin (viii) public defender eligibility status; new text end new text begin (ix) booking date; new text end new text begin (x) release date; and new text end new text begin (xi) all pending cases associated with the defendant and all booking dates and charges for each case; new text end new text begin (2) for each formal charge, including charges resulting in convictions, filed against a defendant: new text end new text begin (i) charge number; new text end new text begin (ii) charge description; new text end new text begin (iii) charge statute; new text end new text begin (iv) charge type; new text end new text begin (v) charge class severity; new text end new text begin (vi) charge disposition; new text end new text begin (vii) method of disposition, including pretrial diversion, plea negotiation, or trial; new text end new text begin (viii) charge disposition date; and new text end new text begin (ix) prosecuting office, agency, or attorney; new text end new text begin (3) for bail or bond pretrial releases: new text end new text begin (i) date of first appearance before the court; new text end new text begin (ii) judge who presided over the defendant's first appearance and set bail; new text end new text begin (iii) pretrial evaluation form or data contained in the form, including but not limited to the pretrial risk assessment score; new text end new text begin (iv) amount of bail, if any, set at first appearance, including whether there was a percentage of the bail that could be paid directly to the court; new text end new text begin (v) other conditions of release, if any, set at first appearance; new text end new text begin (vi) nonmonetary conditions of release; new text end new text begin (vii) cash bail or bond amount; new text end new text begin (viii) date of pretrial release, if any; new text end new text begin (ix) release type, including release on own recognizance, release on monetary bond, release after completed sentence, transfer to prison, transfer to jail in another jurisdiction, or transfer to ICE or other federal agencies; new text end new text begin (x) time served credit length; new text end new text begin (xi) bail or bond revocation due to a new offense, a failure to appear, or violation of the terms of bail or bond; and new text end new text begin (xii) if revocation occurred, whether there was also a reinstatement of the bail or bond; new text end new text begin (4) for each criminal case: new text end new text begin (i) whether the defendant failed to appear at any hearings and whether warrants were issued; new text end new text begin (ii) whether the defendant was charged with a new crime during the pretrial period, including the level of charge and statute charged; new text end new text begin (iii) defense attorney type, including whether it was a public defender, private counsel, pro se, or contract attorney; and new text end new text begin (iv) outcome of the defendant's case, including but not limited to dismissal, acquittal, guilty plea, and guilty verdict; new text end new text begin (5) for each sentencing: new text end new text begin (i) plea date, if any; new text end new text begin (ii) sentence date; new text end new text begin (iii) charge sentenced to, charge number, charge description, statute, type, and charge class severity; new text end new text begin (iv) sentence type; new text end new text begin (v) sentence length; new text end new text begin (vi) fine and fees and whether they were waived or stayed due to inability to pay; and new text end new text begin (vii) restitution amount ordered, amount collected, and amount paid to victim; and new text end new text begin (6) any other information required by the Sentencing Guidelines Commission. new text end new text begin (b) Each official or agency collecting the information required in paragraph (a) shall forward this information to the Sentencing Guidelines Commission and the Bureau of Criminal Apprehension in a timely manner under a schedule and format directed by the commission. The commission shall ensure that each official and agency reports the information in a uniform and consistent format. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Repository. new text end new text begin The Bureau of Criminal Apprehension shall act as a repository for the information collected under subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Subd. 3. new text end new text begin Sentencing Guidelines Commission. new text end new text begin (a) The Sentencing Guidelines Commission, in consultation with representatives from all major criminal legal system agencies, including but not limited to the Department of Corrections, jail administrators, the state court administrator's office and the judicial branch, public defenders, prosecutors, law enforcement, probation officers, and community nonprofits and individual community members with expertise in data systems and pretrial policy, shall: new text end new text begin (1) provide ongoing advice about the types of data analysis necessary for understanding and evaluating the pretrial system; new text end new text begin (2) determine whether additional information should be reported under subdivision 1; and new text end new text begin (3) allow for information sharing and problem solving among the officials and agencies required to collect information under subdivision 1 or act as the repository of that information under subdivision 2. new text end new text begin (b) Each year beginning January 1, 2026, the Bureau of Criminal Apprehension shall submit the prior calendar year information collected under subdivision 1 to the Sentencing Guidelines Commission. In its annual report to the legislature, the commission shall study, research, summarize, and analyze the information. The commission may contract with a nonprofit research-based organization to do this. new text end new text begin Subd. 4. new text end new text begin Public dashboard. new text end new text begin By July 1, 2030, the Bureau of Criminal Apprehension shall create and operate an interactive public dashboard of the information collected under subdivision 1. The dashboard must be searchable and helpful to members of the public, researchers, and other interested parties seeking information. new text end Sec. 2. new text begin APPROPRIATIONS.new text end new text begin Subdivision 1. new text end new text begin Sentencing Guidelines Commission. new text end new text begin $....... in fiscal year 2026 and $....... in fiscal year 2027 are appropriated from the general fund to the Sentencing Guidelines Commission: (1) to implement this act; and (2) for a grant to a nonprofit research-based organization to study, research, summarize, and analyze the information collected under Minnesota Statutes, section 609.016, subdivision 1, to provide understanding of current and historical practices in the state. The grant shall be awarded through a competitive grant process. new text end new text begin Subd. 2. new text end new text begin Public safety. new text end new text begin $....... in fiscal year 2026 and $....... in fiscal year 2027 are appropriated from the general fund to the commissioner of public safety for: (1) grants to criminal justice officials and entities to hire additional staff, update case management systems, and develop new processes for data entry to fully facilitate collecting the information required in Minnesota Statutes, section 609.016, subdivision 1; and (2) the Bureau of Criminal Apprehension's costs to implement this act. new text end